Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-904
School retirement system; administration; retirement board; powers and duties; rules and regulations.

The general administration of the retirement system, except the investment of funds, is hereby vested in the retirement board. The board may, by a majority vote of its members, adopt bylaws and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, from time to time, to carry out the School Employees Retirement Act. The board shall perform such other duties as may be required to execute the act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 3, p. 640;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2903;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 437, p. 842;

Laws 1967, c. 486, § 42, p. 1530;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 86, p. 2400;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 18;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 26;

Laws 1995, LB 369, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 29;

R.S.Supp.,1995, § 79-1503;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 539;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 19;

Laws 2018, LB1005, § 19.
July 19, 2018